Louisiana, session 2026, HB1004.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Article 4911(A) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 4911. Jurisdiction in justice of the peace courts; concurrent with district court;
amount in dispute
A. The civil jurisdiction of a justice of the peace court is concurrent with the
district court in cases where the amount in dispute does not exceed five ten thousand
dollars.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2107 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1004